Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB829.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Findings and declarations.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Hynerpeton bassetti is a specific type of extinct tetrapod and an early four-limbed vertebrate that resembled a modern day amphibian.(2) Hynerpeton, meaning "crawling animal from Hyner," is unique to this Commonwealth and was discovered in 1993 at the Red Hill fossil site near Hyner, Pennsylvania.(3) Due to the robust structure of the shoulder girdle, the Hynerpeton was thought to have very powerful muscles, which aided it in walking and swimming.(4) The fossilized remains of Hynerpeton bassetti were only found at the Red Hill fossil site, making this vertebrate unique to this Commonwealth.12345678910111213141516171819 (5) Naming the Hynerpeton bassetti as the official State fossil of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania will promote appreciation, education and the study of fossils in this Commonwealth.Section 2. Official State fossil.The Hynerpeton bassetti is selected, designated and adopted as the official State fossil of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.Section 3. Repeal.The act of December 5, 1988 (P.L.1113, No.138), is repealed.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0829PN0906 - 2 - 123456789101112